Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.070

Allocation of state funds for technical assistance—Contracting with agencies for technical assistance.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction may allocate state funds, as may be appropriated, to provide technical assistance to eligible school districts interested in developing and implementing a cooperative project.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction may contract with other agencies to provide some or all of the technical assistance under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1988 c 268 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.100.092.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.